Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3191.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNION GOSPEL MISSION TWIN CITIES.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Union Gospel Mission Twin Cities to continue to provide and improve adult education and workforce development services for adults facing homelessness, hunger, and addiction. These services include job-seeking skill development; education, including GED, ESL, job readiness, and financial literacy, as well as support services to remove barriers to employment including clothing, transportation, and child care. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end